Oklahoma, session 2025, SB492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503A, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-504, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-505, is


hereby repealed.

Req. No. 1499 Page 1


SECTION 5. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-506, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 6. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-507, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 7. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-508, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1499 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:27 AM































Req. No. 1499 Page 2